de: Eignung für Fußgewölbetyp: Hohes Fußgewölbe; Flaches Fußgewölbe (Plattfuß); Normales Fußgewölbe; Universell; Sonstiges
sv: Passform för fotvalv: Högt fotvalv; Lågt fotvalv (plattfot); Medelhögt fotvalv; Universell; Övrigt
en: Foot arch type suitability: High arch; Low arch (flat); Medium arch; Universal; Other
tr: Ayak kemeri tipi uygunluğu: Yüksek taban; Düşük taban (düz); Orta taban; Evrensel; Diğer
lt-LT: Tinkamumas pėdos skliauto tipui: Aukštas skliautas; Žemas skliautas (plokščias); Vidutinis skliautas; Universalus; Kita
pt-PT: Adequação ao tipo de arco plantar: Arco alto; Arco baixo (chato); Arco médio; Universal; Outro
ko: 아치형 발 형태 적합성: 하이 아치; 낮은 아치(평발); 중간 아치; 범용; 기타
el: Καταλληλότητα τύπου καμάρας ποδιού: Υψηλή καμάρα; Χαμηλή καμάρα (πλατυποδία); Μεσαία καμάρα; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
zh-TW: 足弓類型適用性: 高足弓; 低足弓 (扁平); 中足弓; 通用; 其他
fi: Jalkaholvityypin sopivuus: Korkea jalkaholvi; Matala jalkaholvi (litteä); Keskikorkea jalkaholvi; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
nl: Geschikt voetboogtype: Hoge voetboog; Lage voetboog (plat); Gemiddelde voetboog; Universeel; Overige
hu: Lábboltozat-típushoz való alkalmasság: Magas boltozat; Alacsony boltozat (lúdtalp); Közepes boltozat; Univerzális; Egyéb
ru: Подходящий тип свода стопы: Высокий свод; Низкий свод (плоская стопа); Средний свод; Универсальный; Другое
da: Egnethed for fodsvangstype: Høj svang; Lav svang (platfod); Medium svang; Universal; Andet
hr-HR: Prikladnost za tip svoda stopala: Visoki svod; Niski svod (ravno); Srednji svod; Univerzalno; Ostalo
es: Adecuación del tipo de arco de pie: Arco alto; Arco bajo (plano); Arco medio; Universal; Otro
vi: Độ phù hợp với các loại vòm bàn chân: Vòm cao; Vòm thấp (bẹt); Vòm trung bình; Phổ quát; Khác
fr: Adaptation au type de voûte plantaire: Voûte plantaire haute; Voûte plantaire basse (plate); Voûte plantaire moyenne; Universel; Autre
it: Idoneità per tipo di arco plantare: Arco plantare alto; Arco plantare basso (piatto); Arco plantare medio; Universale; Altro
bg-BG: Съвместимост с тип свод на стъпалото: Висок свод; Нисък свод (плоскостъпие); Среден свод; Универсална; Друг
sk-SK: Vhodnosť pre typ klenby nohy: Vysoká klenba; Nízka klenba (plochá); Stredná klenba; Univerzálna; Iné
th: ความเหมาะสมของรูปทรงอุ้งเท้า: อุ้งเท้าสูง; อุ้งเท้าต่ำ (แบน); อุ้งเท้าปานกลาง; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 足弓类型适宜度: 高足弓; 低足弓（扁平）; 中足弓; 通用; 其他
pt-BR: Adequação ao tipo de arco do pé: Arco alto; Arco baixo (chato); Arco médio; Universal; Outra
ja: 足アーチタイプ適合性: ハイアーチ; ローアーチ (扁平足); ミディアムアーチ; ユニバーサル; その他
cs: Vhodnost pro daný typ klenby chodidla: Vysoká klenba; Nízká klenba (plochá); Střední klenba; Univerzální; Jiné
pl: Odpowiedni typ łuku stopy: Wysokie podbicie; Niskie podbicie (płaskostopie); Średnie podbicie; Uniwersalne; Inne
nb: Egnethet for type fotblad: Høy fotbue; Lav fotbue (flat); Middels fotbue; Universell; Annet
ro-RO: Potrivire pentru tipul de boltă plantară: Boltă înaltă; Boltă joasă (plat); Boltă medie; Universal; Altele
sl-SI: Primernost glede na vrsto nožnega loka: Visok stopalni lok; Nizek stopalni lok (ploski); Srednji stopalni lok; Univerzalno; Drugo